Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
ARTICLE 10.5
CARE AND TREATMENT OF PERSONS WITH
INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES

Cross references:

For provisions concerning home- and community-based services for persons with developmental disabilities, see part 3 of article 6 of title 25.5.

Section

PART 1 RIGHTS OF PERSONS WITH
INTELLECTUAL AND
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES

PART 2 STATE COUNCIL ON
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES

PART 3 REGIONAL CENTERS

PART 4 FAMILY SUPPORT SERVICES

PART 5 COLORADO FAMILY SUPPORT LOAN FUND

PART 6 STUDY OF SELF-SUFFICIENCY TRUSTS

PART 7 COORDINATED SYSTEM OF PAYMENT FOR EARLY INTERVENTION SERVICES FOR INFANTS AND TODDLERS

PART 8 OUTCOME-BASED SUPPORTED EMPLOYMENT SYSTEM
FOR INTEGRATED EMPLOYMENT SERVICES
FOR PERSONS WITH DISABILITIES, INCLUDING
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES

PART 9 STATE EMPLOYMENT OF PERSONS WITH
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES

PART 10 GENERAL PROVISIONS